Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
(1) As used in this section:
(a) “Indicated prevention” means prevention  strategies that focus on individuals who
exhibit early signs of substance use or other risk factors but who do not have a  diagnosable
substance use disorder.
(b) “Primary prevention” means  practices, programs and policies designed to prevent,
delay and reduce the incidence and prevalence of youth substance use.
(c) “Selective prevention” means prevention strategies that target individuals, or groups
of individuals, whose risk of developing a substance use disorder is significantly  higher than
average.
(d) “Universal prevention” means prevention  strategies that are aimed at the general
public or a whole  population group, without identifying individuals who are at particular risk
of developing a substance use disorder.
(2) The Alcohol and  Drug Policy Commission shall develop and implement plans, including
a statewide primary  prevention strategy, that address the entire youth continuum of care
and are designed to prevent the onset of substance use by:
(a) Promoting health and well-being among individuals who have not  begun using alcohol,
tobacco or controlled substances; and
(b) Utilizing universal prevention, selective prevention and indicated prevention strate-
gies.
(3) In developing the plans  described in subsection (2) of this section, the commission
shall:
(a) Conduct a  comprehensive inventory and assessment of existing primary prevention
programs in this state,  including programs that are school-based or provided by youth-
serving agencies or organizations.  The comprehensive inventory and assessment must in-
clude an assessment of the current workforce, types of entities  supporting or administering
the programs, types of interventions being utilized, effectiveness of  the programs, feasibility
of increasing the services of the programs, funding streams and areas of unmet need.
(b) Conduct an assessment of existing gaps in the provider workforce and service delivery
system for youth in need  of all levels of substance use disorder treatment, including inten-
sive outpatient treatment, residential  treatment, withdrawal management and treatment for
co-occurring disorders.
Enrolled House Bill 3321 (HB 3321-B) Page 1
(c) Conduct, or contract with a third party to conduct, a financial accounting of  current
primary prevention expenses in  this state, including services funded and the funding sources
and amounts for those services.
(d) Define state agency responsibilities, outline funding  models and identify implementa-
tion strategies and expected outcomes.
(4) No later than September  15, 2026, the commission shall report to the interim com-
mittees of the Legislative Assembly related  to health, in the manner provided in ORS 192.245,
on the commission’s findings and recommendations under this section.
SECTION 2. The Alcohol and Drug Policy Commission, in collaboration  with the Oregon
Health and Science University, shall provide education and technical  assistance to providers
of youth substance use disorder treatment and early intervention.
SECTION 3. In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,  there is appropri-
ated to  the Oregon Health Authority, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2025, out of the
General Fund, the  amount of $921,232, for behavioral health, for the Alcohol and Drug Policy
Commission to carry out the provisions of sections 1 and 2 of this 2025 Act.
SECTION 4. Section 1 of this 2025 Act is repealed on January 2, 2027.
Passed by House June 23, 2025
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Julie Fahey, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 25, 2025
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2025
..................................................................................
Tobias Read, Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3321 (HB 3321-B) Page 2